Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-804
Water commissioner and light commissioner; compensation; removal.

If a city of the second class has created a board of public works as provided in section 17-801, the water commissioner and light commissioner shall, subject to confirmation by the mayor and city council, be employed by such board at such reasonable compensation as may be agreed upon at the time of such employment and shall thereafter be under the jurisdiction of such board, any of the provisions of sections 17-501 to 17-560 to the contrary notwithstanding. Any water commissioner or light commissioner, under the jurisdiction and control of the board of public works, may be removed by the board, after an opportunity to be heard before the mayor and city council if he or she shall so request, for malfeasance, misfeasance, or neglect in office.

Laws 1935, c. 33, § 2, p. 139;

Laws 1937, c. 34, § 1, p. 161;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-702;

R.S.1943, § 17-804;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 233.